src/fst/morphology/affixes/nonverbalConjugation.lexc
LEXICON CLT/COP-PRS-PL2 
@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.TPERS.2@@D.TNUM.SG@+Clt/Cop+Prs+ScPl2:@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.TPERS.2@@D.TNUM.SG@%>т%{АЯ%}до FOC-PCLE-OR-NOT ;
@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.TPERS.2@@D.TNUM.SG@+Clt/Cop+Prs+ScPl2+Err/Orth-d:@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.TPERS.2@@D.TNUM.SG@%^TD%>т%{АЯ%}до FOC-PCLE-OR-NOT ;

LEXICON CLT/COP-PRS-PL3
@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.TPERS.3@@D.TNUM.SG@+Clt/Cop+Prs+ScPl3:@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.TPERS.3@@D.TNUM.SG@%>т%{ЬØ%} FOC-PCLE-OR-NOT ;

LEXICON CLT/COP-PRS-PL3_ZERO
@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.TPERS.3@@D.TNUM.SG@+Clt/Cop+Prs+ScPl3:@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.TPERS.3@@D.TNUM.SG@ FOC-PCLE-OR-NOT ;

LEXICON CLT/COP-PRT2-SG1
@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.TPERS.1@@D.TNUM.PL@+Clt/Cop+Prt2+ScSg1:@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.TPERS.1@@D.TNUM.PL@%>%{оеэØ%}линь FOC-PCLE-OR-NOT ;

LEXICON CLT/COP-PRT2-SG2
@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.TPERS.2@@D.TNUM.PL@+Clt/Cop+Prt2+ScSg2:@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.TPERS.2@@D.TNUM.PL@%>%{оеэØ%}лить FOC-PCLE-OR-NOT ;

LEXICON CLT/COP-PRT2-SG3
@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.TPERS.3@@D.TNUM.PL@+Clt/Cop+Prt2+ScSg3:@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.TPERS.3@@D.TNUM.PL@%>%{оеэØ%}ль FOC-PCLE-OR-NOT ;

LEXICON CLT/COP-PRT2-PL1
@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.TPERS.1@@D.TNUM.SG@+Clt/Cop+Prt2+ScPl1:@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.TPERS.1@@D.TNUM.SG@%>%{оеэØ%}линек FOC-PCLE-OR-NOT ;

LEXICON CLT/COP-PRT2-PL2
@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.TPERS.2@@D.TNUM.SG@+Clt/Cop+Prt2+ScPl2:@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.TPERS.2@@D.TNUM.SG@%>%{оеэØ%}лиде FOC-PCLE-OR-NOT ;

LEXICON CLT/COP-PRT2-PL3
@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.TPERS.3@@D.TNUM.SG@+Clt/Cop+Prt2+ScPl3:@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.TPERS.3@@D.TNUM.SG@%>%{оеэØ%}льть FOC-PCLE-OR-NOT ;



! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
